Ohio, session 136, HB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 4508.02, 4511.03, 4511.12, 4511.132, 4511.17, 4511.20, 4511.202, 4511.204, 4511.205, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.251, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.54, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.991, and 5517.07 be amended and section 4511.993 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4508.02. (A)(1) The director of public safety, subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt and prescribe such rules concerning the administration and enforcement of this chapter as are necessary to protect the public. The rules shall require an assessment of the holder of a probationary instructor license. The director shall inspect the school facilities and equipment of applicants and licensees and examine applicants for instructor's licenses. (2) The director shall adopt rules governing online driver education courses that may be completed via the internet to satisfy the classroom instruction under division (C) of this section. The rules shall do all of the following: (a) Establish standards that an online driver training enterprise must satisfy to be licensed to offer an online driver education course via the internet, including, at a minimum, proven expertise in providing driver education and an acceptable infrastructure capable of providing secure online driver education in accord with advances in internet technology. The rules shall allow an online driver training enterprise to be affiliated with a licensed driver training school offering in-person classroom instruction, but shall not require such an affiliation. (b) Establish content requirements that an online driver education course must satisfy to be approved as equivalent to twenty-four hours of in-person classroom instruction; (c) Establish attendance standards, including a maximum number of course hours that may be completed in a twenty-four-hour period; (d) Allow an enrolled applicant to begin the required eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction upon completing all twenty-four hours of course instruction; (e) Establish any other requirements necessary to regulate online driver education. (B) The director shall administer and enforce this chapter. (C) The rules shall require twenty-four hours of completed in-person classroom instruction or the completion of an approved, equivalent online driver education course offered via the internet by a licensed online driver training enterprise, followed by eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction conducted on public streets and highways of this state for all beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles who are under age eighteen. The rules also shall require the classroom instruction or online driver education course for such drivers to include instruction on both all of the following: (1) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while distracted, including while using an electronic wireless communications device, or engaging in any other activity that distracts a driver from the safe and effective operation of a motor vehicle; (2) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of a controlled substance, prescription medication, or alcohol.; (3) The dangers of and requirements related to driving a motor vehicle in a construction zone. (D) The rules shall state the minimum hours for classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction required for beginning drivers of commercial trucks, commercial cars, buses, and commercial tractors, trailers, and semitrailers. (E)(1) The department of public safety may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise in an amount sufficient to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in the regulation of online driver education courses. (2) The department shall supply to each licensed online driver training enterprise certificates to be used for certifying an applicant's enrollment in an approved online driver education course and a separate certificate to be issued upon successful completion of an approved online driver education course. The certificates shall be numbered serially. The department may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise per certificate supplied to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in supplying the certificates. (F) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing an abbreviated driver training course for adults. Sec. 4511.03. (A) The driver of any emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle, when responding to an emergency call, upon approaching a red or stop signal or any stop sign shall slow down as necessary for safety to traffic, but may proceed cautiously past such red or stop sign or signal with due regard for the safety of all persons using the street or highway. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.12. (A) No pedestrian, driver of a vehicle, or operator of a streetcar or trackless trolley shall disobey the instructions of any traffic control device placed in accordance with this chapter, unless at the time otherwise directed by a police officer. No provision of this chapter for which signs are required shall be enforced against an alleged violator if at the time and place of the alleged violation an official sign is not in proper position and sufficiently legible to be seen by an ordinarily observant person. Whenever a particular section of this chapter does not state that signs are required, that section shall be effective even though no signs are erected or in place. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.132. (A) The driver of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley who approaches an intersection where traffic is controlled by traffic control signals shall do all of the following if the signal facing the driver exhibits no colored lights or colored lighted arrows, exhibits a combination of such lights or arrows that fails to clearly indicate the assignment of right-of-way, or, if the vehicle is a bicycle or an electric bicycle, the signals are otherwise malfunctioning due to the failure of a vehicle detector to detect the presence of the bicycle or electric bicycle: (1) Stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, stop before entering the intersection; (2) Yield the right-of-way to all vehicles, streetcars, or trackless trolleys in the intersection or approaching on an intersecting road, if the vehicles, streetcars, or trackless trolleys will constitute an immediate hazard during the time the driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways; (3) Exercise ordinary care while proceeding through the intersection. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.17. (A) No person, without lawful authority, shall do any of the following: (1) Knowingly move, deface, damage, destroy, or otherwise improperly tamper with any traffic control device, any railroad sign or signal, or any inscription, shield, or insignia on the device, sign, or signal, or any part of the device, sign, or signal; (2) Knowingly drive upon or over any freshly applied pavement marking material on the surface of a roadway while the marking materiel is in an undried condition and is marked by flags, markers, signs, or other devices intended to protect it; (3) Knowingly move, damage, destroy, or otherwise improperly tamper with a manhole cover. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (A)(1) or (3) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If a violation of division (A)(1) or (3) of this section creates a risk of physical harm to any person, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. If a violation of division (A)(1) or (3) of this section causes serious physical harm to property that is owned, leased, or controlled by a state or local authority, the offender is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (A)(2) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates division (A)(2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates division (A)(2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (C) If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4511.20. (A) No person shall operate a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar on any street or highway in willful or wanton disregard of the safety of persons or property. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. Whoever violates this section within a construction zone, as defined in section 4511.993 of the Revised Code, is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4511.202. (A) No person shall operate a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, streetcar, agricultural tractor, or agricultural tractor that is towing, pulling, or otherwise drawing a unit of farm machinery on any street, highway, or property open to the public for vehicular traffic without being in reasonable control of the vehicle, trolley, streetcar, agricultural tractor, or unit of farm machinery. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of operating a motor vehicle or agricultural tractor without being in control of it, a minor misdemeanor. (C) If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. (D) If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.204. (A) No person shall operate a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar on any street, highway, or property open to the public for vehicular traffic while using, holding, or physically supporting with any part of the person's body an electronic wireless communications device. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (1) A person using an electronic wireless communications device to make contact, for emergency purposes, with a law enforcement agency, hospital or health care provider, fire department, or other similar emergency agency or entity; (2) A person driving a public safety vehicle while using an electronic wireless communications device in the course of the person's duties; (3) A person using an electronic wireless communications device when the person's motor vehicle is in a stationary position and is outside a lane of travel, at a traffic control signal that is currently directing traffic to stop, or parked on a road or highway due to an emergency or road closure; (4) A person using and holding an electronic wireless communications device directly near the person's ear for the purpose of making, receiving, or conducting a telephone call, provided that the person does not manually enter letters, numbers, or symbols into the device; (5) A person receiving wireless messages on an electronic wireless communications device regarding the operation or navigation of a motor vehicle; safety-related information, including emergency, traffic, or weather alerts; or data used primarily by the motor vehicle, provided that the person does not hold or support the device with any part of the person's body; (6) A person using the speaker phone function of the electronic wireless communications device, provided that the person does not hold or support the device with any part of the person's body; (7) A person using an electronic wireless communications device for navigation purposes, provided that the person does not do either of the following during the use: (a) Manually enter letters, numbers, or symbols into the device; (b) Hold or support the device with any part of the person's body. (8) A person using a feature or function of the electronic wireless communications device with a single touch or single swipe, provided that the person does not do either of the following during the use: (a) Manually enter letters, numbers, or symbols into the device; (b) Hold or support the device with any part of the person's body. (9) A person operating a commercial truck while using a mobile data terminal that transmits and receives data; (10) A person operating a utility service vehicle or a vehicle for or on behalf of a utility, if the person is acting in response to an emergency, power outage, or circumstance that affects the health or safety of individuals; (11) A person using an electronic wireless communications device in conjunction with a voice-operated or hands-free feature or function of the vehicle or of the device without the use of either hand except to activate, deactivate, or initiate the feature or function with a single touch or swipe, provided the person does not hold or support the device with any part of the person's body; (12) A person using technology that physically or electronically integrates the device into the motor vehicle, provided that the person does not do either of the following during the use: (a) Manually enter letters, numbers, or symbols into the device; (b) Hold or support the device with any part of the person's body. (13) A person storing an electronic wireless communications device in a holster, harness, or article of clothing on the person's body. (C)(1) On January 31 of each year, the department of public safety shall issue a report to the general assembly that specifies the number of citations issued for violations of this section during the previous calendar year. (2) If a law enforcement officer issues an offender a ticket, citation, or summons for a violation of division (A) of this section, the officer shall do both of the following: (a) Report the issuance of the ticket, citation, or summons to the officer's law enforcement agency; (b) Ensure that such report indicates the offender's race. (D) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of operating a motor vehicle while using an electronic wireless communication device, an unclassified misdemeanor, and shall be punished as provided in divisions (D)(1) to (5) (6) of this section. (1) The offender shall be fined, and is subject to a suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege, as follows: (a) Except as provided in divisions (D)(1)(b), (c), (d), and (2) of this section, the court shall impose upon the offender a fine of not more than one hundred fifty dollars. (b) If, within two years of the violation, the offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one prior violation of this section or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, the court shall impose upon the offender a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars. (c) If, within two years of the violation, the offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more prior violations of this section or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance, the court shall impose upon the offender a fine of not more than five hundred dollars. The court also may impose a suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for ninety days. (d) Notwithstanding divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section, if the offender was operating the motor vehicle at the time of the violation in a construction zone where a sign was posted in accordance with section 4511.98 of the Revised Code, the court, in addition to all other penalties provided by law, shall impose upon the offender a fine of two times the amount imposed for the violation under division (D)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, as applicable. (2) If the offender is in the category of offenders to whom division (D)(1)(a) of this section applies, in lieu of payment of the fine of one hundred fifty dollars under division (D)(1)(a) of this section and the assessment of points under division (D)(4) of this section, the offender instead may elect to attend the distracted driving safety course, as described in section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender attends and successfully completes the course, the offender shall be issued written evidence that the offender successfully completed the course. The offender shall not be required to pay the fine and shall not have the points assessed against that offender's driver's license if the offender submits the written evidence to the court within 90 days of the violation of division (A) of this section. However, successful completion of the course does not result in a dismissal of the charges for the violation, and the violation is a prior offense under divisions (D)(1)(b) and (c) of this section if the offender commits a subsequent violation or violations of division (A) of this section within two years of the offense for which the course was completed. This division does not apply with respect to any offender in the category of offenders to whom division (D)(1)(b), (c), or (d) , or (5) of this section applies. (3) The court may impose any other penalty authorized under sections 2929.21 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code. However, the court shall not impose a fine or a suspension not otherwise specified in division (D)(1) of this section. The court also shall not impose a jail term or community residential sanction. (4) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, points shall be assessed for a violation of division (A) of this section in accordance with section 4510.036 of the Revised Code. (5) If the offender commits an offense established under this section while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. (6) The offense established under this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of this offense as a strict liability offense shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. (E) This section shall not be construed as invalidating, preempting, or superseding a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance that prescribes penalties for violations of that ordinance that are greater than the penalties prescribed in this section for violations of this section. (F) A prosecution for an offense in violation of this section does not preclude a prosecution for an offense in violation of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance based on the same conduct. However, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) A law enforcement officer does not have probable cause and shall not stop the operator of a motor vehicle for purposes of enforcing this section unless the officer visually observes the operator using, holding, or physically supporting with any part of the person's body the electronic wireless communications device. (2) A law enforcement officer who stops the operator of a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar for a violation of division (A) of this section shall inform the operator that the operator may decline a search of the operator's electronic wireless communications device. The officer shall not do any of the following: (a) Access the device without a warrant, unless the operator voluntarily and unequivocally gives consent for the officer to access the device; (b) Confiscate the device while awaiting the issuance of a warrant to access the device; (c) Obtain consent from the operator to access the device through coercion or any other improper means. Any consent by the operator to access the device shall be voluntary and unequivocal before the officer may access the device without a warrant. (H) As used in this section: (1) "Electronic wireless communications device" includes any of the following: (a) A wireless telephone; (b) A text-messaging device; (c) A personal digital assistant; (d) A computer, including a laptop computer and a computer tablet; (e) Any device capable of displaying a video, movie, broadcast television image, or visual image; (f) Any other substantially similar wireless device that is designed or used to communicate text, initiate or receive communication, or exchange information or data. An "electronic wireless communications device" does not include a two-way radio transmitter or receiver used by a person who is licensed by the federal communications commission to participate in the amateur radio service. (2) "Voice-operated or hands-free feature or function" means a feature or function that allows a person to use an electronic wireless communications device without the use of either hand, except to activate, deactivate, or initiate the feature or function with a single touch or single swipe. (3) "Utility" means an entity specified in division (A), (C), (D), (E), or (G) of section 4905.03 of the Revised Code. (4) "Utility service vehicle" means a vehicle owned or operated by a utility. Sec. 4511.205. (A) No holder of a temporary instruction permit who has not attained the age of eighteen years and no holder of a probationary driver's license shall drive a motor vehicle on any street, highway, or property used by the public for purposes of vehicular traffic or parking while using in any manner an electronic wireless communications device. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (1) A person using an electronic wireless communications device for emergency purposes, including an emergency contact with a law enforcement agency, hospital or health care provider, fire department, or other similar emergency agency or entity; (2) A person using an electronic wireless communications device whose motor vehicle is in a stationary position and the motor vehicle is outside a lane of travel; (3) A person using a navigation device in a voice-operated or hands-free manner who does not manipulate the device while driving. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, whoever violates division (A) of this section shall be fined one hundred fifty dollars. In addition, the court shall impose a class seven suspension of the offender's driver's license or permit for a definite period of sixty days. (2) If the person previously has been adjudicated a delinquent child or a juvenile traffic offender for a violation of this section, whoever violates this section shall be fined three hundred dollars. In addition, the court shall impose a class seven suspension of the person's driver's license or permit for a definite period of one year. (3) If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. (D) The filing of a sworn complaint against a person for a violation of this section does not preclude the filing of a sworn complaint for a violation of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance for the same conduct. However, if a person is adjudicated a delinquent child or a juvenile traffic offender for a violation of this section and is also adjudicated a delinquent child or a juvenile traffic offender for a violation of a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance for the same conduct, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in this section, "electronic wireless communications device" includes any of the following: (1) A wireless telephone; (2) A personal digital assistant; (3) A computer, including a laptop computer and a computer tablet; (4) A text-messaging device; (5) Any other substantially similar electronic wireless device that is designed or used to communicate via voice, image, or written word. Sec. 4511.21. (A) No person shall operate a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar at a speed greater or less than is reasonable or proper, having due regard to the traffic, surface, and width of the street or highway and any other conditions, and no person shall drive any motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar in and upon any street or highway at a greater speed than will permit the person to bring it to a stop within the assured clear distance ahead. (B) It is prima-facie lawful, in the absence of a lower limit declared or established pursuant to this section by the director of transportation or local authorities, for the operator of a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar to operate the same at a speed not exceeding the following: (1)(a) Twenty miles per hour in school zones during school recess and while children are going to or leaving school during the opening or closing hours, and when twenty miles per hour school speed limit signs are erected; except that, on controlled-access highways and expressways, if the right-of-way line fence has been erected without pedestrian opening, the speed shall be governed by division (B)(4) of this section and on freeways, if the right-of-way line fence has been erected without pedestrian opening, the speed shall be governed by divisions (B)(10) and (11) of this section. The end of every school zone may be marked by a sign indicating the end of the zone. Nothing in this section or in the manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic control devices shall be construed to require school zones to be indicated by signs equipped with flashing or other lights, or giving other special notice of the hours in which the school zone speed limit is in effect. (b) As used in this section and in section 4511.212 of the Revised Code, "school" means all of the following: (i) Any school chartered under section 3301.16 of the Revised Code; (ii) Any nonchartered school that during the preceding year filed with the department of education and workforce in compliance with rule 3301-35-08 of the Ohio Administrative Code, a copy of the school's report for the parents of the school's pupils certifying that the school meets Ohio minimum standards for nonchartered, nontax-supported schools and presents evidence of this filing to the jurisdiction from which it is requesting the establishment of a school zone; (iii) Any special elementary school that in writing requests the county engineer of the county in which the special elementary school is located to create a school zone at the location of that school. Upon receipt of such a written request, the county engineer shall create a school zone at that location by erecting the appropriate signs. (iv) Any preschool education program operated by an educational service center that is located on a street or highway with a speed limit of forty-five miles per hour or more, when the educational service center in writing requests that the county engineer of the county in which the program is located create a school zone at the location of that program. Upon receipt of such a written request, the county engineer shall create a school zone at that location by erecting the appropriate signs. (c) As used in this section, "school zone" means that portion of a street or highway passing a school fronting upon the street or highway that is encompassed by projecting the school property lines to the fronting street or highway, and also includes that portion of a state highway. Upon request from local authorities for streets and highways under their jurisdiction and that portion of a state highway under the jurisdiction of the director of transportation or a request from a county engineer in the case of a school zone for a special elementary school, the director may extend the traditional school zone boundaries. The distances in divisions (B)(1)(c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this section shall not exceed three hundred feet per approach per direction and are bounded by whichever of the following distances or combinations thereof the director approves as most appropriate: (i) The distance encompassed by projecting the school building lines normal to the fronting highway and extending a distance of three hundred feet on each approach direction; (ii) The distance encompassed by projecting the school property lines intersecting the fronting highway and extending a distance of three hundred feet on each approach direction; (iii) The distance encompassed by the special marking of the pavement for a principal school pupil crosswalk plus a distance of three hundred feet on each approach direction of the highway. Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate the director's initial action on August 9, 1976, establishing all school zones at the traditional school zone boundaries defined by projecting school property lines, except when those boundaries are extended as provided in divisions (B)(1)(a) and (c) of this section. (d) As used in this division, "crosswalk" has the meaning given that term in division (LL)(2) of section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. The director may, upon request by resolution of the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, the board of trustees of a township, or a county board of developmental disabilities created pursuant to Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code, and upon submission by the municipal corporation, township, or county board of such engineering, traffic, and other information as the director considers necessary, designate a school zone on any portion of a state route lying within the municipal corporation, lying within the unincorporated territory of the township, or lying adjacent to the property of a school that is operated by such county board, that includes a crosswalk customarily used by children going to or leaving a school during recess and opening and closing hours, whenever the distance, as measured in a straight line, from the school property line nearest the crosswalk to the nearest point of the crosswalk is no more than one thousand three hundred twenty feet. Such a school zone shall include the distance encompassed by the crosswalk and extending three hundred feet on each approach direction of the state route. (e) As used in this section, "special elementary school" means a school that meets all of the following criteria: (i) It is not chartered and does not receive tax revenue from any source. (ii) It does not educate children beyond the eighth grade. (iii) It is located outside the limits of a municipal corporation. (iv) A majority of the total number of students enrolled at the school are not related by blood. (v) The principal or other person in charge of the special elementary school annually sends a report to the superintendent of the school district in which the special elementary school is located indicating the total number of students enrolled at the school, but otherwise the principal or other person in charge does not report any other information or data to the superintendent. (2) Twenty-five miles per hour in all other portions of a municipal corporation, except on state routes outside business districts, through highways outside business districts, and alleys; (3) Thirty-five miles per hour on all state routes or through highways within municipal corporations outside business districts, except as provided in divisions (B)(4) and (6) of this section; (4) Fifty miles per hour on controlled-access highways and expressways within municipal corporations, except as provided in divisions (B)(12), (13), (14), (15), and (16) of this section; (5) Fifty-five miles per hour on highways outside municipal corporations, other than highways within island jurisdictions as provided in division (B)(8) of this section, highways as provided in divisions (B)(9) and (10) of this section, and highways, expressways, and freeways as provided in divisions (B)(12), (13), (14), and (16) of this section; (6) Fifty miles per hour on state routes within municipal corporations outside urban districts unless a lower prima-facie speed is established as further provided in this section; (7) Fifteen miles per hour on all alleys within the municipal corporation; (8) Thirty-five miles per hour on highways outside municipal corporations that are within an island jurisdiction; (9) Thirty-five miles per hour on through highways, except state routes, that are outside municipal corporations and that are within a national park with boundaries extending through two or more counties; (10) Sixty miles per hour on two-lane state routes outside municipal corporations as established by the director under division (H)(2) of this section; (11) Fifty-five miles per hour on freeways with paved shoulders inside municipal corporations, other than freeways as provided in divisions (B)(14) and (16) of this section; (12) Sixty miles per hour on rural expressways with traffic control signals and on all portions of rural divided highways, except as provided in divisions (B)(13) and (14) of this section; (13) Sixty-five miles per hour on all rural expressways without traffic control signals; (14) Seventy miles per hour on all rural freeways; (15) Fifty-five miles per hour on all portions of freeways or expressways in congested areas as determined by the director and that are located within a municipal corporation or within an interstate freeway outerbelt, except as provided in division (B)(16) of this section; (16) Sixty-five miles per hour on all portions of freeways or expressways without traffic control signals in urbanized areas. (C) It is prima-facie unlawful for any person to exceed any of the speed limitations in divisions (B)(1)(a), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), and (9) of this section, or any declared or established pursuant to this section by the director or local authorities and it is unlawful for any person to exceed any of the speed limitations in division (D) of this section. No person shall be convicted of more than one violation of this section for the same conduct, although violations of more than one provision of this section may be charged in the alternative in a single affidavit. (D) No person shall operate a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar upon a street or highway as follows: (1) At a speed exceeding fifty-five miles per hour, except upon a two-lane state route as provided in division (B)(10) of this section and upon a highway, expressway, or freeway as provided in divisions (B)(12), (13), (14), and (16) of this section; (2) At a speed exceeding sixty miles per hour upon a two-lane state route as provided in division (B)(10) of this section and upon a highway as provided in division (B)(12) of this section; (3) At a speed exceeding sixty-five miles per hour upon an expressway as provided in division (B)(13) or upon a freeway as provided in division (B)(16) of this section, except upon a freeway as provided in division (B)(14) of this section; (4) At a speed exceeding seventy miles per hour upon a freeway as provided in division (B)(14) of this section; (5) At a speed exceeding the posted speed limit upon a highway, expressway, or freeway for which the director has determined and declared a speed limit pursuant to division (I)(2) or (L)(2) of this section. (E) In every charge of violation of this section the affidavit and warrant shall specify the time, place, and speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven, and in charges made in reliance upon division (C) of this section also the speed which division (B)(1)(a), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of, or a limit declared or established pursuant to, this section declares is prima-facie lawful at the time and place of such alleged violation, except that in affidavits where a person is alleged to have driven at a greater speed than will permit the person to bring the vehicle to a stop within the assured clear distance ahead the affidavit and warrant need not specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven. (F) When a speed in excess of both a prima-facie limitation and a limitation in division (D) of this section is alleged, the defendant shall be charged in a single affidavit, alleging a single act, with a violation indicated of both division (B)(1)(a), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section, or of a limit declared or established pursuant to this section by the director or local authorities, and of the limitation in division (D) of this section. If the court finds a violation of division (B)(1)(a), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of, or a limit declared or established pursuant to, this section has occurred, it shall enter a judgment of conviction under such division and dismiss the charge under division (D) of this section. If it finds no violation of division (B)(1)(a), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of, or a limit declared or established pursuant to, this section, it shall then consider whether the evidence supports a conviction under division (D) of this section. (G) Points shall be assessed for violation of a limitation under division (D) of this section in accordance with section 4510.036 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Whenever the director determines upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that any speed limit set forth in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (D) of this section is greater or less than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at any portion of a street or highway under the jurisdiction of the director, the director shall determine and declare a reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit, which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice of it are erected at the location. (2) Whenever the director determines upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the speed limit of fifty-five miles per hour on a two-lane state route outside a municipal corporation is less than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at that portion of the state route, the director may determine and declare a speed limit of sixty miles per hour for that portion of the state route, which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice of it are erected at the location. (3)(a) For purposes of the safe and orderly movement of traffic upon any portion of a street or highway under the jurisdiction of the director, the director may establish a variable speed limit that is different than the speed limit established by or under this section on all or portions of interstate six hundred seventy, interstate two hundred seventy-five, and interstate ninety commencing at the intersection of that interstate with interstate seventy-one and continuing to the border of the state of Ohio with the state of Pennsylvania. The director shall establish criteria for determining the appropriate use of variable speed limits and shall establish variable speed limits in accordance with the criteria. The director may establish variable speed limits based upon the time of day, weather conditions, traffic incidents, or other factors that affect the safe speed on a street or highway. The director shall not establish a variable speed limit that is based on a particular type or class of vehicle. A variable speed limit established by the director under this section is effective when appropriate signs giving notice of the speed limit are displayed at the location. (b) Except for variable speed limits established under division (H)(3)(a) of this section, the director shall establish a variable speed limit under the authority granted to the director by this section on not more than two additional highways and only pursuant to criteria established in rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The rules shall be based on the criteria described in division (H)(3)(a) of this section. The rules also shall establish the parameters of any engineering study necessary for determining when variable speed limits are appropriate. (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the director to establish speed limits within a construction zone as authorized under section 4511.98 of the Revised Code. (I)(1) Except as provided in divisions (I)(2), (J), (K), and (N) of this section, whenever local authorities determine upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the speed permitted by divisions (B)(1)(a) to (D) of this section, on any part of a highway under their jurisdiction, is greater than is reasonable and safe under the conditions found to exist at such location, the local authorities may by resolution request the director to determine and declare a reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit. Upon receipt of such request the director may determine and declare a reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit at such location, and if the director does so, then such declared speed limit shall become effective only when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected at such location by the local authorities. The director may withdraw the declaration of a prima-facie speed limit whenever in the director's opinion the altered prima-facie speed limit becomes unreasonable. Upon such withdrawal, the declared prima-facie speed limit shall become ineffective and the signs relating thereto shall be immediately removed by the local authorities. (2) A local authority may determine on the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the speed limit of sixty-five or seventy miles per hour on a portion of a freeway under its jurisdiction is greater than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at that portion of the freeway. If the local authority makes such a determination, the local authority by resolution may request the director to determine and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit of not less than fifty-five miles per hour for that portion of the freeway. If the director takes such action, the declared speed limit becomes effective only when appropriate signs giving notice of it are erected at such location by the local authority. (J) Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may authorize by ordinance higher prima-facie speeds than those stated in this section upon through highways, or upon highways or portions thereof where there are no intersections, or between widely spaced intersections, provided signs are erected giving notice of the authorized speed, but local authorities shall not modify or alter the basic rule set forth in division (A) of this section or in any event authorize by ordinance a speed in excess of the maximum speed permitted by division (D) of this section for the specified type of highway. Alteration of prima-facie limits on state routes by local authorities shall not be effective until the alteration has been approved by the director. The director may withdraw approval of any altered prima-facie speed limits whenever in the director's opinion any altered prima-facie speed becomes unreasonable, and upon such withdrawal, the altered prima-facie speed shall become ineffective and the signs relating thereto shall be immediately removed by the local authorities. (K)(1) As used in divisions (K)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, "unimproved highway" means a highway consisting of any of the following: (a) Unimproved earth; (b) Unimproved graded and drained earth; (c) Gravel. (2) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (K)(4) and (5) of this section, whenever a board of township trustees determines upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the speed permitted by division (B)(5) of this section on any part of an unimproved highway under its jurisdiction and in the unincorporated territory of the township is greater than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at the location, the board may by resolution declare a reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit of fifty-five but not less than twenty-five miles per hour. An altered speed limit adopted by a board of township trustees under this division becomes effective when appropriate traffic control devices, as prescribed in section 4511.11 of the Revised Code, giving notice thereof are erected at the location, which shall be no sooner than sixty days after adoption of the resolution. (3)(a) Whenever, in the opinion of a board of township trustees, any altered prima-facie speed limit established by the board under this division becomes unreasonable, the board may adopt a resolution withdrawing the altered prima-facie speed limit. Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the altered prima-facie speed limit becomes ineffective and the traffic control devices relating thereto shall be immediately removed. (b) Whenever a highway ceases to be an unimproved highway and the board has adopted an altered prima-facie speed limit pursuant to division (K)(2) of this section, the board shall, by resolution, withdraw the altered prima-facie speed limit as soon as the highway ceases to be unimproved. Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the altered prima-facie speed limit becomes ineffective and the traffic control devices relating thereto shall be immediately removed. (4)(a) If the boundary of two townships rests on the centerline of an unimproved highway in unincorporated territory and both townships have jurisdiction over the highway, neither of the boards of township trustees of such townships may declare an altered prima-facie speed limit pursuant to division (K)(2) of this section on the part of the highway under their joint jurisdiction unless the boards of township trustees of both of the townships determine, upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the speed permitted by division (B)(5) of this section is greater than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at the location and both boards agree upon a reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit of less than fifty-five but not less than twenty-five miles per hour for that location. If both boards so agree, each shall follow the procedure specified in division (K)(2) of this section for altering the prima-facie speed limit on the highway. Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(4)(b) of this section, no speed limit altered pursuant to division (K)(4)(a) of this section may be withdrawn unless the boards of township trustees of both townships determine that the altered prima-facie speed limit previously adopted becomes unreasonable and each board adopts a resolution withdrawing the altered prima-facie speed limit pursuant to the procedure specified in division (K)(3)(a) of this section. (b) Whenever a highway described in division (K)(4)(a) of this section ceases to be an unimproved highway and two boards of township trustees have adopted an altered prima-facie speed limit pursuant to division (K)(4)(a) of this section, both boards shall, by resolution, withdraw the altered prima-facie speed limit as soon as the highway ceases to be unimproved. Upon the adoption of the resolution, the altered prima-facie speed limit becomes ineffective and the traffic control devices relating thereto shall be immediately removed. (5) As used in division (K)(5) of this section: (a) "Commercial subdivision" means any platted territory outside the limits of a municipal corporation and fronting a highway where, for a distance of three hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with buildings in use for commercial purposes, or where the entire length of the highway is less than three hundred feet long and the frontage is improved with buildings in use for commercial purposes. (b) "Residential subdivision" means any platted territory outside the limits of a municipal corporation and fronting a highway, where, for a distance of three hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business, or where the entire length of the highway is less than three hundred feet long and the frontage is improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. Whenever a board of township trustees finds upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the prima-facie speed permitted by division (B)(5) of this section on any part of a highway under its jurisdiction that is located in a commercial or residential subdivision, except on highways or portions thereof at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from the majority of intersecting highways is required to yield the right-of-way to vehicles on such highways in obedience to stop or yield signs or traffic control signals, is greater than is reasonable and safe under the conditions found to exist at the location, the board may by resolution declare a reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit of less than fifty-five but not less than twenty-five miles per hour at the location. An altered speed limit adopted by a board of township trustees under this division shall become effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected at the location by the township. Whenever, in the opinion of a board of township trustees, any altered prima-facie speed limit established by it under this division becomes unreasonable, it may adopt a resolution withdrawing the altered prima-facie speed, and upon such withdrawal, the altered prima-facie speed shall become ineffective, and the signs relating thereto shall be immediately removed by the township. (L)(1) The director of transportation, based upon an engineering study, as defined by the director, of a highway, expressway, or freeway described in division (B)(12), (13), (14), (15), or (16) of this section, in consultation with the director of public safety and, if applicable, the local authority having jurisdiction over the studied highway, expressway, or freeway, may determine and declare that the speed limit established on such highway, expressway, or freeway under division (B)(12), (13), (14), (15), or (16) of this section either is reasonable and safe or is more or less than that which is reasonable and safe. (2) If the established speed limit for a highway, expressway, or freeway studied pursuant to division (L)(1) of this section is determined to be more or less than that which is reasonable and safe, the director of transportation, in consultation with the director of public safety and, if applicable, the local authority having jurisdiction over the studied highway, expressway, or freeway, shall determine and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit for that highway, expressway, or freeway. (M)(1)(a) If the boundary of two local authorities rests on the centerline of a highway and both authorities have jurisdiction over the highway, the speed limit for the part of the highway within their joint jurisdiction shall be either one of the following as agreed to by both authorities: (i) Either prima-facie speed limit permitted by division (B) of this section; (ii) An altered speed limit determined and posted in accordance with this section. (b) If the local authorities are unable to reach an agreement, the speed limit shall remain as established and posted under this section. (2) Neither local authority may declare an altered prima-facie speed limit pursuant to this section on the part of the highway under their joint jurisdiction unless both of the local authorities determine, upon the basis of criteria established by an engineering study, as defined by the director, that the speed permitted by this section is greater than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist at the location and both authorities agree upon a uniform reasonable and safe prima-facie speed limit of less than fifty-five but not less than twenty-five miles per hour for that location. If both authorities so agree, each shall follow the procedure specified in this section for altering the prima-facie speed limit on the highway, and the speed limit for the part of the highway within their joint jurisdiction shall be uniformly altered. No altered speed limit may be withdrawn unless both local authorities determine that the altered prima-facie speed limit previously adopted becomes unreasonable and each adopts a resolution withdrawing the altered prima-facie speed limit pursuant to the procedure specified in this section. (N) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township in which a boarding school is located, by resolution or ordinance, may establish a boarding school zone. The legislative authority may alter the speed limit on any street or highway within the boarding school zone and shall specify the hours during which the altered speed limit is in effect. For purposes of determining the boundaries of the boarding school zone, the altered speed limit within the boarding school zone, and the hours the altered speed limit is in effect, the legislative authority shall consult with the administration of the boarding school and with the county engineer or other appropriate engineer, as applicable. A boarding school zone speed limit becomes effective only when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected at the appropriate locations. (O) As used in this section: (1) "Interstate system" has the same meaning as in 23 U.S.C. 101. (2) "Commercial bus" means a motor vehicle designed for carrying more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of persons for compensation. (3) "Noncommercial bus" includes but is not limited to a school bus or a motor vehicle operated solely for the transportation of persons associated with a charitable or nonprofit organization. (4) "Outerbelt" means a portion of a freeway that is part of the interstate system and is located in the outer vicinity of a major municipal corporation or group of municipal corporations, as designated by the director. (5) "Rural" means an area outside urbanized areas and outside of a business or urban district, and areas that extend within urbanized areas where the roadway characteristics remain mostly unchanged from those outside the urbanized areas. (6) "Urbanized area" has the same meaning as in 23 U.S.C. 101. (7) "Divided" means a roadway having two or more travel lanes for vehicles moving in opposite directions and that is separated by a median of more than four feet, excluding turn lanes. (P)(1) A violation of any provision of this section is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (P)(1)(b), (1)(c), (2), and (3) of this section, a minor misdemeanor; (b) If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two violations of any provision of this section or of any provision of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any provision of this section, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree; (c) If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more violations of any provision of this section or of any provision of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any provision of this section, a misdemeanor of the third degree. (2) If the offender operated a motor vehicle faster than thirty-five miles an hour in a business district of a municipal corporation, faster than fifty miles an hour in other portions of a municipal corporation, or faster than thirty-five miles an hour in a school zone during recess or while children are going to or leaving school during the school's opening or closing hours, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. Division (P)(2) of this section does not apply if penalties may be imposed under division (P)(1)(b) or (c) of this section. (3) Notwithstanding division (P)(1) of this section, if the offender operated a motor vehicle in a construction zone where a sign was then posted in accordance with section 4511.98 of the Revised Code, the both of the following apply: (a) The court, in addition to all other penalties provided by law, shall impose upon the offender a fine of two times the usual amount imposed for the violation. No court shall impose a fine of two times the usual amount imposed for the violation upon an offender if the offender alleges, in an affidavit filed with the court prior to the offender's sentencing, that the offender is indigent and is unable to pay the fine imposed pursuant to this division and if the court determines that the offender is an indigent person and unable to pay the fine. (b) If division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code also applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. (4) If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4511.211. (A) The owner of a private road or driveway located in a private residential area containing twenty or more dwelling units may establish a speed limit on the road or driveway by complying with all of the following requirements: (1) The speed limit is not less than twenty-five miles per hour and is indicated by a sign that is in a proper position, is sufficiently legible to be seen by an ordinarily observant person, and meets the specifications for the basic speed limit sign included in the manual adopted by the department of transportation pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code; (2) The owner has posted a sign at the entrance of the private road or driveway that is in plain view and clearly informs persons entering the road or driveway that they are entering private property, a speed limit has been established for the road or driveway, and the speed limit is enforceable by law enforcement officers under state law. (B) No person shall operate a vehicle upon a private road or driveway as provided in division (A) of this section at a speed exceeding any speed limit established and posted pursuant to that division. (C) When a speed limit is established and posted in accordance with division (A) of this section, any law enforcement officer may apprehend a person violating the speed limit of the residential area by utilizing any of the means described in section 4511.091 of the Revised Code or by any other accepted method of determining the speed of a motor vehicle and may stop and charge the person with exceeding the speed limit. (D) Points shall be assessed for violation of a speed limit established and posted in accordance with division (A) of this section in accordance with section 4510.036 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Owner" includes but is not limited to a person who holds title to the real property in fee simple, a condominium owners' association, a property owner's association, the board of directors or trustees of a private community, and a nonprofit corporation governing a private community. (2) "Private residential area containing twenty or more dwelling units" does not include a Chautauqua assembly as defined in section 4511.90 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) A violation of division (B) of this section is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (F)(1)(b) and (c) of this section, a minor misdemeanor; (b) If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two violations of division (B) of this section or of any municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to division (B) of this section, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree; (c) If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more violations of division (B) of this section or of any municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to division (B) of this section, a misdemeanor of the third degree. (2) If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. (3) If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.213. (A) The driver of a motor vehicle, upon approaching a stationary public safety vehicle, emergency vehicle, road service vehicle, waste collection vehicle, vehicle used by the public utilities commission to conduct motor vehicle inspections in accordance with sections 4923.04 and 4923.06 of the Revised Code, or a highway maintenance vehicle that is displaying the appropriate visual signals by means of flashing, oscillating, or rotating lights, as prescribed in section 4513.17 of the Revised Code, shall do either of the following: (1) If the driver of the motor vehicle is traveling on a highway that consists of at least two lanes that carry traffic in the same direction of travel as that of the driver's motor vehicle, the driver shall proceed with due caution and, if possible and with due regard to the road, weather, and traffic conditions, shall change lanes into a lane that is not adjacent to that of the stationary public safety vehicle, emergency vehicle, road service vehicle, waste collection vehicle, vehicle used by the public utilities commission to conduct motor vehicle inspections in accordance with sections 4923.04 and 4923.06 of the Revised Code, or a highway maintenance vehicle. (2) If the driver is not traveling on a highway of a type described in division (A)(1) of this section, or if the driver is traveling on a highway of that type but it is not possible to change lanes or if to do so would be unsafe, the driver shall proceed with due caution, reduce the speed of the motor vehicle, and maintain a safe speed for the road, weather, and traffic conditions. (B) This section does not relieve the driver of a public safety vehicle, emergency vehicle, road service vehicle, waste collection vehicle, vehicle used by the public utilities commission to conduct motor vehicle inspections in accordance with sections 4923.04 and 4923.06 of the Revised Code, or a highway maintenance vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and property upon the highway. (C) No person shall fail to drive a motor vehicle in compliance with division (A)(1) or (2) of this section when so required by division (A) of this section. (D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (2) Notwithstanding section 2929.28 of the Revised Code, upon a finding that a person operated a motor vehicle in violation of division (C) of this section, the court, in addition to all other penalties provided by law, shall impose a fine of two times the usual amount imposed for the violation. (3) If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. (4) If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. (E) The offense established under this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of this offense as a strict liability offense shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. Sec. 4511.22. (A) No person shall stop or operate a vehicle, trackless trolley, or street car at such an unreasonably slow speed as to impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, except when stopping or reduced speed is necessary for safe operation or to comply with law. (B) Whenever the director of transportation or local authorities determine on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that slow speeds on any part of a controlled-access highway, expressway, or freeway consistently impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, the director or such local authority may declare a minimum speed limit below which no person shall operate a motor vehicle, trackless trolley, or street car except when necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law. No minimum speed limit established hereunder shall be less than thirty miles per hour, greater than fifty miles per hour, nor effective until the provisions of section 4511.21 of the Revised Code, relating to appropriate signs, have been fulfilled and local authorities have obtained the approval of the director. (C) In a case involving a violation of this section, the trier of fact, in determining whether the vehicle was being operated at an unreasonably slow speed, shall consider the capabilities of the vehicle and its operator. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.23. (A) No person shall operate a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar over any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway at a speed which is greater than the maximum speed that can be maintained with safety to such bridge or structure, when such structure is posted with signs as provided in this section. The department of transportation upon request from any local authority shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway, and if it finds that such structure cannot with safety withstand traffic traveling at the speed otherwise permissible under sections 4511.01 to 4511.85 and 4511.98 4511.993 of the Revised Code, the department shall determine and declare the maximum speed of traffic which such structure can withstand, and shall cause or permit suitable signs stating such maximum speed to be erected and maintained at a distance of at least one hundred feet before each end of such structure. Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation of this section, proof of said determination of the maximum speed by the department and the existence of said signs shall constitute prima-facie evidence of the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to such bridge or structure. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.25. (A) Upon all roadways of sufficient width, a vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows: (1) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, or when making a left turn under the rules governing such movements; (2) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such distance as to constitute an immediate hazard; (3) When driving upon a roadway divided into three or more marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable thereon; (4) When driving upon a roadway designated and posted with signs for one-way traffic; (5) When otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control device. (B)(1) Upon all roadways any vehicle or trackless trolley proceeding at less than the prevailing and lawful speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic, and far enough to the right to allow passing by faster vehicles if such passing is safe and reasonable, except under any of the following circumstances: (a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle or trackless trolley proceeding in the same direction; (b) When preparing for a left turn; (c) When the driver must necessarily drive in a lane other than the right-hand lane to continue on the driver's intended route. (2) Nothing in division (B)(1) of this section requires a driver of a slower vehicle to compromise the driver's safety to allow overtaking by a faster vehicle. (C) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic and providing for two-way movement of traffic, no vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven to the left of the center line of the roadway, except when authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain lanes to the left of the center of the roadway for use by traffic not otherwise permitted to use the lanes, or except as permitted under division (A)(2) of this section. This division shall not be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making a left turn into or from an alley, private road, or driveway. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.251. (A) As used in this section and section 4510.036 of the Revised Code: (1) "Street racing" means the operation of two or more vehicles from a point side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive attempt to out-distance each other or the operation of one or more vehicles over a common selected course, from the same point to the same point, wherein timing is made of the participating vehicles involving competitive accelerations or speeds. The operation of two or more vehicles side by side either at speeds in excess of prima-facie lawful speeds established by divisions (B)(1)(a) to (B)(9) of section 4511.21 of the Revised Code or rapidly accelerating from a common starting point to a speed in excess of such prima-facie lawful speeds shall be prima-facie evidence of street racing. (2) "Burnout" means a maneuver performed while operating a vehicle whereby the vehicle is kept in a stationary position, but the wheels of the vehicle are spun, which may cause the tires of the vehicle to become heated and emit smoke from the friction. (3) "Doughnut" means a maneuver performed while operating a vehicle whereby the front or rear of the vehicle is rotated around the opposite set of wheels in a continuous motion, which may cause a circular skid-mark pattern of rubber on the driving surface, or the tires of the vehicle to become heated and emit smoke from the friction, or both. (4) "Drifting" means a maneuver performed while operating a vehicle whereby the vehicle is driven in a manner that causes a controlled, sideways skid during a turn, with the front wheels pointing in a direction that is the opposite of the direction of the turn. (5) "Wheelie" means a maneuver performed while operating a vehicle whereby the front wheel or wheels of the vehicle are raised off of the ground or whereby two wheels that are on the same side of the vehicle are raised off of the ground. (6) "Stunt driving" means performing or engaging in burnouts, doughnuts, drifting, or wheelies, or allowing a passenger to ride either partially or fully outside of the vehicle while operating that vehicle. (7) "Street takeover" means blocking or impeding the regular flow of vehicle or pedestrian traffic on a public road, street, or highway or on private property that is open to the general public for the purpose of street racing or stunt driving. (B) No person shall knowingly participate in street racing, stunt driving, or street takeover upon any public road, street, or highway, or on private property that is open to the general public. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of street racing, stunt driving, or street takeover, a misdemeanor of the first degree. In addition to any other sanctions, the court shall suspend the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for not less than thirty days or more than three years. No judge shall suspend the first thirty days of any suspension of an offender's license, permit, or privilege imposed under this division. (D) Persons rendering assistance in any manner to street racing, stunt driving, or street takeover shall be equally charged as the participants. (E) This section does not apply to the competitive operation of vehicles on public or private property when the political subdivision with jurisdiction of the location or owner of the property knowingly permits such operation thereon. (F) If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.26. (A) Operators of vehicles and trackless trolleys proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right, and upon roadways having width for not more than one line of traffic in each direction, each operator shall give to the other one-half of the main traveled portion of the roadway or as nearly one-half as is reasonable possible. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.27. (A) The following rules govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles or trackless trolleys proceeding in the same direction: (1) The operator of a vehicle or trackless trolley overtaking another vehicle or trackless trolley proceeding in the same direction shall, except as provided in division (A)(3) of this section, signal to the vehicle or trackless trolley to be overtaken, shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance, and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle or trackless trolley. When a motor vehicle or trackless trolley overtakes and passes a bicycle or electric bicycle, three feet or greater is considered a safe passing distance. (2) Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the operator of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle at the latter's audible signal, and the operator shall not increase the speed of the operator's vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle. (3) The operator of a vehicle or trackless trolley overtaking and passing another vehicle or trackless trolley proceeding in the same direction on a divided highway as defined in section 4511.35 of the Revised Code, a limited access highway as defined in section 5511.02 of the Revised Code, or a highway with four or more traffic lanes, is not required to signal audibly to the vehicle or trackless trolley being overtaken and passed. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.28. (A) The driver of a vehicle or trackless trolley may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle or trackless trolley only under the following conditions: (1) When the vehicle or trackless trolley overtaken is making or about to make a left turn; (2) Upon a roadway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for two or more lines of vehicles moving lawfully in the direction being traveled by the overtaking vehicle. (B) The driver of a vehicle or trackless trolley may overtake and pass another vehicle or trackless trolley only under conditions permitting such movement in safety. The movement shall not be made by driving off the roadway. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.29. (A) No vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven to the left of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing traffic proceeding in the same direction, unless such left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit such overtaking and passing to be completely made, without interfering with the safe operation of any traffic approaching from the opposite direction or any traffic overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle or trackless trolley must return to an authorized lane of travel as soon as practicable and in the event the passing movement involves the use of a lane authorized for traffic approaching from the opposite direction, before coming within two hundred feet of any approaching vehicle. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.30. (A) No vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven upon the left side of the roadway under the following conditions: (1) When approaching the crest of a grade or upon a curve in the highway, where the operator's view is obstructed within such a distance as to create a hazard in the event traffic might approach from the opposite direction; (2) When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred feet of any bridge, viaduct, or tunnel; (3) When approaching within one hundred feet of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing. (B) This section does not apply to vehicles or trackless trolleys upon a one-way roadway, upon a roadway where traffic is lawfully directed to be driven to the left side, or under the conditions described in division (A)(2) of section 4511.25 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.31. (A) The department of transportation may determine those portions of any state highway where overtaking and passing other traffic or driving to the left of the center or center line of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may, by appropriate signs or markings on the highway, indicate the beginning and end of such zones. When such signs or markings are in place and clearly visible, every operator of a vehicle or trackless trolley shall obey the directions of the signs or markings, notwithstanding the distances set out in section 4511.30 of the Revised Code. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply when all of the following apply: (1) The slower vehicle is proceeding at less than half the speed of the speed limit applicable to that location. (2) The faster vehicle is capable of overtaking and passing the slower vehicle without exceeding the speed limit. (3) There is sufficient clear sight distance to the left of the center or center line of the roadway to meet the overtaking and passing provisions of section 4511.29 of the Revised Code, considering the speed of the slower vehicle. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.32. (A) The department of transportation may designate any highway or any separate roadway under its jurisdiction for one-way traffic and shall erect appropriate signs giving notice thereof. Upon a roadway designated and posted with signs for one-way traffic a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated. A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island shall be driven only to the right of the rotary traffic island. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.33. (A) Whenever any roadway has been divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for traffic, or wherever within municipal corporations traffic is lawfully moving in two or more substantially continuous lines in the same direction, the following rules apply: (1) A vehicle or trackless trolley shall be driven, as nearly as is practicable, entirely within a single lane or line of traffic and shall not be moved from such lane or line until the driver has first ascertained that such movement can be made with safety. (2) Upon a roadway which is divided into three lanes and provides for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle or trackless trolley shall not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle or trackless trolley where the roadway is clearly visible and such center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or when preparing for a left turn, or where such center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the direction the vehicle or trackless trolley is proceeding and is posted with signs to give notice of such allocation. (3) Official signs may be erected directing specified traffic to use a designated lane or designating those lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular direction regardless of the center of the roadway, or restricting the use of a particular lane to only buses during certain hours or during all hours, and drivers of vehicles and trackless trolleys shall obey the directions of such signs. (4) Official traffic control devices may be installed prohibiting the changing of lanes on sections of roadway and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.34. (A) The operator of a motor vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley shall not follow another vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley, and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway. The driver of any truck, or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle, when traveling upon a roadway outside a business or residence district shall maintain a sufficient space, whenever conditions permit, between such vehicle and another vehicle ahead so an overtaking motor vehicle may enter and occupy such space without danger. This paragraph does not prevent overtaking and passing nor does it apply to any lane specially designated for use by trucks. Outside a municipal corporation, the driver of any truck, or motor vehicle when drawing another vehicle, while ascending to the crest of a grade beyond which the driver's view of a roadway is obstructed, shall not follow within three hundred feet of another truck, or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle. This paragraph shall not apply to any lane specially designated for use by trucks. Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade, shall maintain a sufficient space between such vehicles so an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space without danger. This paragraph shall not apply to funeral processions. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.35. (A) Whenever any highway has been divided into two roadways by an intervening space, or by a physical barrier, or clearly indicated dividing section so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, every vehicle shall be driven only upon the right-hand roadway, and no vehicle shall be driven over, across, or within any such dividing space, barrier, or section, except through an opening, crossover, or intersection established by public authority. This section does not prohibit the occupancy of such dividing space, barrier, or section for the purpose of an emergency stop or in compliance with an order of a police officer. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.36. (A) The driver of a vehicle intending to turn at an intersection shall be governed by the following rules: (1) Approach for a right turn and a right turn shall be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway. (2) At any intersection where traffic is permitted to move in both directions on each roadway entering the intersection, an approach for a left turn shall be made in that portion of the right half of the roadway nearest the center line thereof and by passing to the right of such center line where it enters the intersection and after entering the intersection the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection to the right of the center line of the roadway being entered. Whenever practicable the left turn shall be made in that portion of the intersection to the left of the center of the intersection. (3) At any intersection where traffic is restricted to one direction on one or more of the roadways, the driver of a vehicle intending to turn left at any such intersection shall approach the intersection in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of such vehicle, and after entering the intersection the left turn shall be made so as to leave the intersection, as nearly as practicable, in the left-hand lane of the roadway being entered lawfully available to traffic moving in that lane. (B) The operator of a trackless trolley shall comply with divisions (A)(1), (2), and (3) of this section wherever practicable. (C) The department of transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause markers, buttons, or signs to be placed within or adjacent to intersections and thereby require and direct that a different course from that specified in this section be traveled by vehicles, streetcars, or trackless trolleys, turning at an intersection, and when markers, buttons, or signs are so placed, no operator of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley shall turn such vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley at an intersection other than as directed and required by such markers, buttons, or signs. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.37. (A) Except as provided in section 4511.13 of the Revised Code and division (B) of this section, no vehicle shall be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve, or upon the approach to or near the crest of a grade, if the vehicle cannot be seen within five hundred feet by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction. (B) The driver of an emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle, when responding to an emergency call, may turn the vehicle so as to proceed in the opposite direction. This division applies only when the emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle is responding to an emergency call, is equipped with and displaying at least one flashing, rotating, or oscillating light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred feet to the front of the vehicle, and when the driver of the vehicle is giving an audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell. This division does not relieve the driver of an emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and property upon the highway. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.38. (A) No person shall start a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley which is stopped, standing, or parked until such movement can be made with reasonable safety. Before backing, operators of vehicle, streetcars, or trackless trolleys shall give ample warning, and while backing they shall exercise vigilance not to injure person or property on the street or highway. No person shall back a motor vehicle on a freeway, except: in a rest area; in the performance of public works or official duties; as a result of an emergency caused by an accident or breakdown of a motor vehicle. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.39. (A) No person shall turn a vehicle or trackless trolley or move right or left upon a highway unless and until such person has exercised due care to ascertain that the movement can be made with reasonable safety nor without giving an appropriate signal in the manner hereinafter provided. When required, a signal of intention to turn or move right or left shall be given continuously during not less than the last one hundred feet traveled by the vehicle or trackless trolley before turning, except that in the case of a person operating a bicycle or electric bicycle, the signal shall be made not less than one time but is not required to be continuous. A bicycle or electric bicycle operator is not required to make a signal if the bicycle or electric bicycle is in a designated turn lane, and a signal shall not be given when the operator's hands are needed for the safe operation of the bicycle or electric bicycle. No person shall stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle or trackless trolley without first giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided herein to the driver of any vehicle or trackless trolley immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give a signal. Any stop or turn signal required by this section shall be given either by means of the hand and arm, or by signal lights that clearly indicate to both approaching and following traffic intention to turn or move right or left, except that any motor vehicle in use on a highway shall be equipped with, and the required signal shall be given by, signal lights when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab, or load of such motor vehicle exceeds twenty-four inches, or when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the rear limit of the body or load thereof exceeds fourteen feet, whether a single vehicle or a combination of vehicles. The signal lights required by this section shall not be flashed on one side only on a disabled vehicle or trackless trolley, flashed as a courtesy or "do pass" signal to operators of other vehicles or trackless trolleys approaching from the rear, nor be flashed on one side only of a parked vehicle or trackless trolley except as may be necessary for compliance with this section. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.41. (A) When two vehicles, including any trackless trolley or streetcar, approach or enter an intersection from different streets or highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right. (B) The right-of-way rule declared in division (A) of this section is modified at through highways and otherwise as stated in Chapter 4511. of the Revised Code. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.42. (A) The operator of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right of way to any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley approaching from the opposite direction, whenever the approaching vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley is within the intersection or so close to the intersection, alley, private road, or driveway as to constitute an immediate hazard. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.43. (A) Except when directed to proceed by a law enforcement officer, every driver of a vehicle or trackless trolley approaching a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After having stopped, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways. (B) The driver of a vehicle or trackless trolley approaching a yield sign shall slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle or trackless trolley in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time the driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways. Whenever a driver is involved in a collision with a vehicle or trackless trolley in the intersection or junction of roadways, after driving past a yield sign without stopping, the collision shall be prima-facie evidence of the driver's failure to yield the right-of-way. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.431. (A) The driver of a vehicle or trackless trolley emerging from an alley, building, private road, or driveway within a business or residence district shall stop the vehicle or trackless trolley immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across the alley, building entrance, road, or driveway, or in the event there is no sidewalk area, shall stop at the point nearest the street to be entered where the driver has a view of approaching traffic thereon. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.44. (A) The operator of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley about to enter or cross a highway from any place other than another roadway shall yield the right of way to all traffic approaching on the roadway to be entered or crossed. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.441. (A) The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian on a sidewalk. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.451. (A) As used in this section, "funeral procession" means two or more vehicles accompanying the cremated remains or the body of a deceased person in the daytime when each of the vehicles has its headlights lighted and is displaying a purple and white or an orange and white pennant attached to each vehicle in such a manner as to be clearly visible to traffic approaching from any direction. (B) Excepting public safety vehicles proceeding in accordance with section 4511.45 of the Revised Code or when directed otherwise by a police officer, pedestrians and the operators of all vehicles, street cars, and trackless trolleys shall yield the right of way to each vehicle that is a part of a funeral procession. Whenever the lead vehicle in a funeral procession lawfully enters an intersection, the remainder of the vehicles in the procession may continue to follow the lead vehicle through the intersection notwithstanding any traffic control devices or right of way provisions of the Revised Code, provided that the operator of each vehicle exercises due care to avoid colliding with any other vehicle or pedestrian. (C) No person shall operate any vehicle as a part of a funeral procession without having the headlights of the vehicle lighted and without displaying a purple and white or an orange and white pennant in such a manner as to be clearly visible to traffic approaching from any direction. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.46. (A) When traffic control signals are not in place, not in operation, or are not clearly assigning the right-of-way, the driver of a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar shall yield the right of way, slowing down or stopping if need be to so yield or if required by section 4511.132 of the Revised Code, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is upon the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling, or when the pedestrian is approaching so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger. (B) No pedestrian shall suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar which is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard. (C) Division (A) of this section does not apply under the conditions stated in division (B) of section 4511.48 of the Revised Code. (D) Whenever any vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.47. (A) As used in this section "blind person" or "blind pedestrian" means a person having not more than 20/200 visual acuity in the better eye with correcting lenses or visual acuity greater than 20/200 but with a limitation in the fields of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees. The driver of every vehicle shall yield the right of way to every blind pedestrian guided by a guide dog, or carrying a cane which is predominantly white or metallic in color, with or without a red tip. (B) No person, other than a blind person, while on any public highway, street, alley, or other public thoroughfare shall carry a white or metallic cane with or without a red tip. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.54. (A) No person riding upon any bicycle, electric bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, skateboard, or toy vehicle shall attach the same or self to any streetcar, trackless trolley, or vehicle upon a roadway. No operator shall knowingly permit any person riding upon any bicycle, electric bicycle, coaster, roller skates, sled, skateboard, or toy vehicle to attach the same or self to any streetcar, trackless trolley, or vehicle while it is moving upon a roadway. This section does not apply to the towing of a disabled vehicle. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.57. (A) The driver of a vehicle shall not overtake and pass upon the left nor drive upon the left side of any streetcar proceeding in the same direction, whether such streetcar is in motion or at rest, except: (1) When so directed by a police officer or traffic control device; (2) When upon a one-way street; (3) When upon a street where the tracks are so located as to prevent compliance with this section; (4) When authorized by local authorities. (B) The driver of any vehicle when permitted to overtake and pass upon the left of a streetcar which has stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging any passenger shall accord pedestrians the right of way. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.58. (A) The driver of a vehicle overtaking upon the right any streetcar stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging any passenger shall stop such vehicle at least five feet to the rear of the nearest running board or door of such streetcar and remain standing until all passengers have boarded such streetcar, or upon alighting therefrom have reached a place of safety, except that where a safety zone has been established, a vehicle need not be brought to a stop before passing any such streetcar or any trackless trolley, but may proceed past such streetcar or trackless trolley at a speed not greater than is reasonable and proper considering the safety of pedestrians. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.59. (A) The driver of any vehicle proceeding upon any streetcar tracks in front of a streetcar shall remove such vehicle from the track as soon as practicable after signal from the operator of said streetcar. The driver of a vehicle upon overtaking and passing a streetcar shall not turn in front of such streetcar unless such movement can be made in safety. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.60. (A) No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.61. (A) As used in this section, "active grade crossing warning device" means signs, signals, gates, or other protective devices erected or installed at a public highway-railway crossing at common grade and activated by an electrical circuit. (B) The department of transportation and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions, with the approval of the department, may designate dangerous highway crossings over railroad tracks whether on state, county, or township highways or on streets or ways within municipal corporations, and erect stop signs thereat. (C)(1) The department and local authorities shall erect stop signs at a railroad highway grade crossing in either of the following circumstances: (a) New warning devices that are not active grade crossing warning devices are being installed at the grade crossing, and railroad crossbucks were the only warning devices at the grade crossing prior to the installation of the new warning devices. (b) The grade crossing is constructed after July 1, 2013, and only warning devices that are not active grade crossing warning devices are installed at the grade crossing. (2) Division (C)(1) of this section does not apply to a railroad highway grade crossing that the director of transportation has exempted from that division because of traffic flow or other considerations or factors. (D) When stop signs are erected pursuant to division (B) or (C) of this section, the operator of any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley shall stop within fifty, but not less than fifteen, feet from the nearest rail of the railroad tracks and shall exercise due care before proceeding across such grade crossing. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.64. (A) No person shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of six or less miles per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than nine inches above the level surface of a roadway, upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section. (1) Before making any such crossing, the person operating or moving any such vehicle or equipment shall first stop the same, and while stopped the person shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching train and for signals indicating the approach of a train, and shall proceed only upon exercising due care. (2) No such crossing shall be made when warning is given by automatic signal or crossing gates or a flagperson or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or car. (B) If the normal sustained speed of such vehicle, equipment, or structure is not more than three miles per hour, the person owning, operating, or moving the same shall also give notice of such intended crossing to a station agent or superintendent of the railroad, and a reasonable time shall be given to such railroad to provide proper protection for such crossing. Where such vehicles or equipment are being used in constructing or repairing a section of highway lying on both sides of a railroad grade crossing, and in such construction or repair it is necessary to repeatedly move such vehicles or equipment over such crossing, one daily notice specifying when such work will start and stating the hours during which it will be prosecuted is sufficient. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.71. (A) No person shall drive upon, along, or across a street or highway, or any part of a street or highway that has been closed in the process of its construction, reconstruction, or repair, and posted with appropriate signs by the authority having jurisdiction to close such highway. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.711. (A) No person shall drive any vehicle, other than a bicycle or an electric bicycle if the motor is not engaged, upon a sidewalk or sidewalk area except upon a permanent or duly authorized temporary driveway. This prohibition does not apply to a law enforcement officer, or other person sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state, using an electric bicycle with the motor engaged while in the performance of the officer's duties. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting local authorities from regulating the operation of bicycles or electric bicycles within their respective jurisdictions, except that no local authority may require that bicycles or electric bicycles be operated on sidewalks. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under section 4511.993 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4511.712. (A) No driver shall enter an intersection or marked crosswalk or drive onto any railroad grade crossing unless there is sufficient space on the other side of the intersection, crosswalk, or grade crossing to accommodate the vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley the driver is operating without obstructing the passage of other vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, pedestrians, or railroad trains, notwithstanding any traffic control signal indication to proceed. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.72. (A) The driver of any vehicle, other than an emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle on official business, shall not follow any emergency vehicle or public safety vehicle traveling in response to an alarm closer than five hundred feet, or drive into or park such vehicle within the block where fire apparatus has stopped in answer to a fire alarm, unless directed to do so by a police officer or a firefighter. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.73. (A) No streetcar, trackless trolley, or vehicle shall, without the consent of the fire department official in command, be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department that is laid down on any street, private driveway, or streetcar track to be used at any fire or alarm of fire. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the offender commits the offense while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the offense, the offender is subject to the additional fine established under section 4511.991 of the Revised Code. If the offender commits the offense while operating a motor vehicle in a construction zone and division (C) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code applies, the offender is subject to the additional penalties established under that section. Sec. 4511.991. (A) As used in this section and each section referenced in division (B) of this section, all of the following apply: (1) "Distracted" means doing either of the following while operating a vehicle: (a) Using an electronic wireless communications device, as defined in section 4511.204 of the Revised Code, in violation of that section; (b) Engaging in any activity that is not necessary to the operation of a vehicle and impairs, or reasonably would be expected to impair, the ability of the operator to drive the vehicle safely. (2) "Distracted" does not include operating a motor vehicle while wearing an earphone or earplug over or in both ears at the same time. A person who so wears earphones or earplugs may be charged with a violation of section 4511.84 of the Revised Code. (3) "Distracted" does not include conducting any activity while operating a utility service vehicle or a vehicle for or on behalf of a utility, provided that the driver of the vehicle is acting in response to an emergency, power outage, or a circumstance affecting the health or safety of individuals. As used in division (A)(3) of this section: (a) "Utility" means an entity specified in division (A), (C), (D), (E), or (G) of section 4905.03 of the Revised Code. (b) "Utility service vehicle" means a vehicle owned or operated by a utility. (B) If an offender violates section 4511.03, 4511.051, 4511.12, 4511.121, 4511.132, 4511.17, 4511.202, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.54, 4511.55, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.713, 4511.72, or 4511.73 of the Revised Code while distracted and the distracting activity is a contributing factor to the commission of the violation, the offender is subject to the applicable penalty for the violation and, notwithstanding section 2929.28 of the Revised Code, is subject to an additional fine of not more than one hundred dollars as follows: (1) Subject to Traffic Rule 13, if a law enforcement officer issues an offender a ticket, citation, or summons for a violation of any of the aforementioned sections of the Revised Code that indicates that the offender was distracted while committing the violation and that the distracting activity was a contributing factor to the commission of the violation, the offender may enter a written plea of guilty and waive the offender's right to contest the ticket, citation, or summons in a trial provided that the offender pays the total amount of the fine established for the violation and pays the additional fine of one hundred dollars. In lieu of payment of the additional fine of one hundred dollars, the offender instead may elect to attend a distracted driving safety course, the duration and contents of which shall be established by the director of public safety. If the offender attends and successfully completes the course, the offender shall be issued written evidence that the offender successfully completed the course. The offender shall be required to pay the total amount of the fine established for the violation, but shall not be required to pay the additional fine of one hundred dollars, so long as the offender submits to the court both the offender's payment in full and such written evidence within ninety days of the underlying violation that resulted in the imposition of the additional fine under division (B) of this section. (2) If the offender appears in person to contest the ticket, citation, or summons in a trial and the offender pleads guilty to or is convicted of the violation, the court, in addition to all other penalties provided by law, may impose the applicable penalty for the violation and may impose the additional fine of not more than one hundred dollars. If the court imposes upon the offender the applicable penalty for the violation and an additional fine of not more than one hundred dollars, the court shall inform the offender that, in lieu of payment of the additional fine of not more than one hundred dollars, the offender instead may elect to attend the distracted driving safety course described in division (B)(1) of this section. If the offender elects the course option and attends and successfully completes the course, the offender shall be issued written evidence that the offender successfully completed the course. The offender shall be required to pay the total amount of the fine established for the violation, but shall not be required to pay the additional fine of not more than one hundred dollars, so long as the offender submits to the court the offender's payment and such written evidence within ninety days of the underlying violation that resulted in the imposition of the additional fine under division (B) of this section. (C) If a law enforcement officer issues an offender a ticket, citation, or summons for a violation of any of the sections of the Revised Code listed in division (B) of this section that indicates that the offender was distracted while committing the violation and that the distracting activity was a contributing factor to the commission of the violation, the officer shall do both of the following: (1) Report the issuance of the ticket, citation, or summons to the officer's law enforcement agency; (2) Ensure that such report indicates the offender's race. Sec. 4511.993. (A) As used in this section, "construction zone" means that lane or portion of street or highway open to vehicular traffic and adjacent to a lane, berm, or shoulder of a street or highway within which lane, berm, or shoulder construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, or any other work of a repair or maintenance nature, including public utility work, is being conducted, commencing with the point where the first sign indicating work is occurring and ending where the last sign specifying the end of the construction zone is located. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, if an operator of a motor vehicle violates section 4511.03, 4511.12, 4511.132, 4511.202, 4511.204, 4511.205, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.251, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.54, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.72, or 4511.73 of the Revised Code while driving in a construction zone, the operator is subject to the applicable penalty for the violation and, notwithstanding section 2929.28 of the Revised Code, the following: (1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) or (3) of this section, a mandatory completion of a driving safety course approved by the director of public safety to be completed by the operator within thirty days after the conviction for the underlying offense; (2) Except as provided in division (B)(3) of this section, if, within five years of the violation, the operator has previously been penalized under this section, a driver's license suspension of ninety days, which shall be in addition to any driver's license suspension imposed for the underlying offense, and mandatory completion of a driving safety course approved by the director of public safety to be completed by the operator within thirty days after the conviction for the underlying offense; (3) If, within five years of the violation, an offender has previously been penalized two or more times under this section, a driver's license suspension of one year, which shall be in addition to any driver's license suspension imposed for the underlying offense, and mandatory completion of a driving safety course approved by the director of public safety to be completed by the operator within thirty days after the conviction for the underlying offense. (C) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the court shall only impose additional penalties as specified under division (B) of this section when all of the following apply: (1) The offense occurs within a construction zone in which a sign is posted in accordance with the rules adopted by the director of transportation under section 5501.27 of the Revised Code. (2) The underlying violation occurs when a construction worker is present in the construction zone. (D) If an offender does not complete the mandatory driving safety course required under division (B) of this section within the applicable thirty days, the court shall impose an additional fine of four hundred dollars on the offender, which shall be in addition to any fine imposed for the underlying offense. (E) The director of public safety shall approve driving safety courses for purposes of this section and shall list approved courses on the web site of the department of public safety. (F)(1) If a law enforcement agency receives a report from any person, including a law enforcement officer, that a violation of one of the traffic offenses listed in division (B) of this section has occurred in a construction zone, that agency may conduct an investigation to attempt to determine or confirm the following: (a) The license plate number, the color, and the make and model of the vehicle used in the alleged violation; (b) The date, approximate time, and location of the alleged violation; (c) The identity of the operator of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation. (2) A law enforcement agency may request and use any sufficiently clear image, images, or video captured by a video camera installed pursuant to section 5517.07 of the Revised Code to determine or confirm the information specified in division (F)(1) of this section. (3) Any images or video obtained by a law enforcement agency pursuant to an investigation in accordance with division (F) of this section is prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein and is admissible in a criminal or traffic prosecution. Sec. 5517.07. (A)(A)(1) If not already present, the department of transportation shall install signs and other traffic control devices designed to slow down the flow of traffic in construction and similar work zones. The signs and devices may include arrow boards, channelizing devices, temporary raise pavement markers, portable changeable message signs, temporary traffic barriers, screens, rumble strips, and any other signs or devices the director of transportation determines are appropriate for the highway and local conditions. (2) A private contractor performing construction work in a construction zone, after consulting with the department or local jurisdiction, as applicable, may install speed monitoring devices in the construction zone that display the speed of passing traffic and that include flashing lights. (B) The department may install video cameras in a construction zone to monitor and record the flow of traffic. The following parameters apply to any video camera installed in a construction zone: (1) The department shall allow a law enforcement agency investigating a possible traffic violation in a construction zone in accordance with division (F) of section 4511.993 of the Revised Code to obtain a copy of any video or image captured by the video camera at the time of the alleged violation. (2) The department may cooperate with a local jurisdiction, at the request of that local jurisdiction, to assist in installing video cameras in a construction zone in that local jurisdiction. (C) The department shall ensure that the placement and specifications for the signs and devices under this section conform to the department's manual of uniform traffic control devices as adopted under section 4511.09 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 4508.02, 4511.03, 4511.12, 4511.132, 4511.17, 4511.20, 4511.202, 4511.204, 4511.205, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.251, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.54, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.991, and 5517.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 4511.132 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 9, H.B. 26, H.B. 95, and H.B. 250, all of the 132nd General Assembly. Section 4511.213 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 95 and S.B. 127 of the 132nd General Assembly. Section 4511.27 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 95 and H.B. 250 of the 132nd General Assembly. Section 4511.39 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 95 and H.B. 250 of the 132nd General Assembly. Section 4511.61 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 26 and H.B. 95 of the 132nd General Assembly.